Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-179
College of Medicine; care and rehabilitation of children with disabilities; interchange of facilities for teaching and treatment.

The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska may cooperate with public or private agencies engaged in the care and rehabilitation of children with disabilities so as to make available an interchange of facilities for teaching and treatment purposes under such terms as may be mutually agreed upon by the Board of Regents and the several agencies desiring the use of such land.

Laws 1955, c. 351, § 3, p. 1073;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 59.